Utah statutes.
61-1-15.   Filing of sales literature.

The division may by rule or order require the filing of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature or advertising communication addressed or intended for distribution to prospective investors, including clients or prospective clients of an investment adviser unless the security or transaction is exempted by Section 61-1-14 or is a federal covered security.

